District of Columbia statutes.
1-504

Designation by Mayor of Dr. King’s birthday as holiday.

The Mayor is authorized to designate the holiday in honor of Dr. King as a holiday for all employees of the government of the District of Columbia. Employees who are required to work on that holiday shall be entitled to such pay as they are entitled to on other holidays during which they work.

History

July 12, 1977, D.C. Law 2-13, § 3, 24 DCR 1443

Cross References

Holidays, recognition of Dr. King’s birthday, see § 28-2701.
Merit system, continuation of existing laws, see § 1-632.06.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-632.06.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-504.
1973 Ed., § 1-314b.